District of Columbia statutes.
16-1043

Nonjudicial enforcement of order.

(a)

A law enforcement officer, upon determining that there is probable cause to believe that a valid foreign protection order exists and that the order has been violated, shall enforce the order as if it were the order of a tribunal of the District. Presentation of a protection order that identifies both the protected individual and the respondent and, on its face, is currently in effect constitutes probable cause to believe that a valid foreign protection order exists. For the purposes of this section, the protection order may be inscribed on a tangible medium or may have been stored in an electronic or other medium if it is retrievable in perceivable form. Presentation of a certified copy of a protection order is not required for enforcement.

(b)

If a foreign protection order is not presented, a law enforcement officer may consider other information in determining whether there is probable cause to believe that a valid foreign protection order exists.

(c)

Registration or filing of an order in the District is not required for the enforcement of a valid foreign protection order pursuant to this subchapter.

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-296, § 2(c), 50 DCR 320
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act.